Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-512
Anti-pollution-of-water measures; special levy.

For the purpose of creating a fund out of which anti-pollution-of-water measures may be financed, any city or village in this state is hereby authorized and empowered to make a special levy of not exceeding three and five-tenths cents on each one hundred dollars upon the taxable value of all the taxable property within such city or village, the proceeds of such levy to be used for such measures.

Laws 1955, c. 49, § 1, p. 168;

Laws 1961, c. 37, § 3, p. 164;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 68;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 69;

Laws 1996, LB 1114, § 33;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 42.
August 28, 2021